Washington statutes.
RCW 18.86.040

Seller's agent—Duties.

(1) Unless additional duties are agreed to in writing signed by a seller's agent, the duties of a seller's agent are limited to those set forth in RCW 18.86.030 and the following, which may not be waived except as expressly set forth in (e) of this subsection:

(a) To be loyal to the seller by taking no action that is adverse or detrimental to the seller's interest in a transaction;

(b) To timely disclose to the seller any conflicts of interest;

(c) To advise the seller to seek expert advice on matters relating to the transaction that are beyond the agent's expertise;

(d) To not disclose any confidential information from or about the seller, except under subpoena or court order, even after termination of the agency relationship; and

(e) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing after the seller's agent has complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f), to make a good faith and continuous effort to find a buyer for the property; except that a seller's agent is not obligated to seek additional offers to purchase the property while the property is subject to an existing contract for sale.

(2)(a) The showing of properties not owned by the seller to prospective buyers or the listing of competing properties for sale by a seller's agent does not in and of itself breach the duty of loyalty to the seller or create a conflict of interest.

(b) The representation of more than one seller by different brokers affiliated with the same firm in competing transactions involving the same buyer does not in and of itself breach the duty of loyalty to the sellers or create a conflict of interest.

[ 2023 c 318 s 4; 2013 c 58 s 5; 1997 c 217 s 2; 1996 c 179 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 318: See note following RCW 18.86.010.

Real estate agency pamphlet—1997 c 217 ss 1-6: See note following RCW 18.86.120.

Effective date—1997 c 217 ss 1-6 and 8: See note following RCW 18.86.020.